Utah statutes.
53A-13-108.   Curriculum and graduation requirements.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall establish rigorous curriculum and graduation requirements under Section 53A-1-402, and consistent with state and federal regulations, for grades 9 through 12 that, beginning no later than with the graduating class of 2008 shall:

(a)  use competency-based standards and assessments;

(b)  include instruction that stresses general financial literacy from basic budgeting to financial investments, including bankruptcy education; and

(c)  increase graduation requirements in language arts, mathematics, and science to exceed the existing credit requirements of 3.0 units in language arts, 2.0 units in mathematics, and 2.0 units in science.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall also establish competency-based standards and assessments for elective courses.

